test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paavir_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:






  Noun - päävir: # 2B
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: pävirin                   #pápárin
    päävir+N+Par:  pävirid                  #pápárid 
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: pápárijguin
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá
